Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.160

Chapter not exclusive—Counties authorized to provide legal aid.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as placing a limitation on the establishment of alternative methods or systems for providing legal aid. Counties are hereby authorized to expend county funds for the establishment of such methods or systems of providing legal aid as shall be deemed in the public interest by the county legislative body.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 109 s 1.]